North Carolina, session 2025, SB499.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Article 7 of Chapter 160D of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 160D-707. Residential development allowed in all commercial zones.
(a) In all areas and districts zoned for commercial, office, or retail use, a local government
shall allow by right, and no amendment to zoning regulations or conditional use permit shall be
required, residential development to the same extent as allowed in areas and districts zoned for
residential use. The provisions of this section include the conversion of a building or a portion of
a building from commercial use to residential use.
(b) Nothing in this section shall be construed to supersede or diminish any applicable
building code, fire code, or other general public health and safety regulations."
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective October 1, 2025.
*S499-v-1*